src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! !! UDMURT Pronoun inflection

!! Udmurt adjectives inflect for:

!! * Number
!! * Case
!! * Determinativity (Absolutive / Determinative)
!! * Comparative (TODO: can comparative co-occur with other stuff?)

!! ! Determinative notes

!! When an adjective occurs in determinative, it must agree for number and case.
!! However, when determinative co-occurs with certain cases, these cases
!! have alternate forms.

!! The cases with alternate forms are:

!! * Accusative singular, plural
!! * Inessive singular, plural
!! * Illative singular, plural
!! * Elative singular, plural

!! Note that these alternative suffixes have palatal and non-palatal versions

!! | Nom.   | бадӟым-ез гурт          | бадӟым-ъёс-ыз гурт-ъёс
!! | Iness. | бадӟым-а-з гурт-ын      | бадӟым-ъёс-а-з гурт-ъёс-ын
!! | Illat. | бадӟым-а-з гурт-э       | бадӟым-ъёс-а-з гурт-ъёс-ы
!! | Elat.  | бадӟым-ысьты-з гурт-ысь | бадӟым-ъёс-ысьты-з гурт-ъёс-ысь

!! | Nom.   | пичи-ез бакча           | пичи-ос-ыз бакча-ос
!! | Iness. | пичи-я-з бакча-ын       | пичи-ос-а-з бакча-ос-ын
!! | Illat. | пичи-я-з бакча-е        | пичи-ос-а-з бакча-ос-ы
!! | Elat.  | пичи-ысьты-з бакча-ысь  | пичи-ос-ысьты-з бакча-ос-ысь

!! TODO: ordering of suffixes sometimes differs? Compare this with possession morph.


!! words with this contlex have not been examined

LEXICON PRON_
+Pron: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1_ !! мон:м
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:он K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen:ынам K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat:ыным K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abl:ынэсьтым K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc:онэ K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins:онэн K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins:онэным K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abe:онтэк K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Apr:онлань K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Advl:онъя K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2_ !тон:т
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:он K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen:ынад K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat:ыныд K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abl:ынэсьтыд K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc:онэ K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ins:тонэн K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ins:тонэныд K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abe:онтэк K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Apr:онлань K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Advl:онъя K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3_ !со:со
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen:лэн K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat:лы K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abl:лэсь K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc:е K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins:ин K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abe:тэк K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Apr:лань K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Advl:я K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1_ !!ми:ми
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen:лям K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat:лемлы K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat:лем K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Abl:лэсьтым K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc:лемыз K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc:лемды K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ins:лемын K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ins:ленымы K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Abe:тэк K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Apr:лань K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Advl:я K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2_ !!тӥ:тӥ
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen:ляд K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat:ледлы K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat:лед K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Abl:лэсьтыд K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc:ледыз K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc:ледды K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ins:ледын K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ins:леныды K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Abe:тэк K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Apr:лань K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Advl:я K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3_ !!соос:соос
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen:лэн K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Dat:лы K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl:лэсь K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc:ыз K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc:ты K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ins:ын K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe:тэк K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Apr:лань K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Advl:ъя K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-MUTUAL
+Nom: K ;
+Apr:%>лань K ;
+Advl:%>ъя K ;
+Abe:%>тэк K ;
+Dat:%>лы K ; !sg3

!LEXICON ADJ_SG/PL_DETERM_CASE
!+Gen+Det:%>Е3злэн K ;
!+Abl+Det:%>Е3злэсь K ;
!+Ins+Det:%>Е3ныз K ;
!+Ine+Det:%>А3з K ;
!+Ill+Det:%>А3з K ;
!+Ela+Det:%>ысьтыз K ;
!+Ela+Det:%>ысеныз K ;
!+Ter+Det:%>озяз K ;
!+Prl+Det:%>Е3тӥз K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
